testing/sma-adj.yaml
  Adjective - jearmijes: # 
    jearmijes+A+Attr: jearmijes 
    jearmijes+A+Sg+Nom: jearmijes 

  Adjective - jearsoes: # 
    jearsoes+A+Attr: jearsoes 
    jearsoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [jearsoesabpa, jearsoesåbpoe]
    jearsoes+A+Sg+Nom: jearsoes 
    jearsoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jearsoesommes

  Adjective - jeenje: # c 
    jeenje+A+Attr: jeenje 
    jeenje+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jeenjebe 
    jeenje+A+Sg+Nom: jeenje 
    jeenje+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jeenjemes

  Adjective - jihtseles: # 
    jihtseles+A+Attr: jihtseles 
    jihtseles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [jihtsielabpa, jihtsielåbpoe]
    jihtseles+A+Sg+Nom: [jihtseles, jihtsele]
    jihtseles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jihtsielommes

  Adjective - jissehts: # 
    jissehts+A+Attr: jissehts 
    jissehts+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [jissiehtabpa, jissiehtåbpoe]
    jissehts+A+Sg+Nom: [jissehte, jissehts]
    jissehts+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jissiehtommes

  Adjective - joekehts: # 
    joekehts+A+Attr: joekehts 
    joekehts+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [joekehtsabpa, joekehtsåbpoe]
    joekehts+A+Sg+Nom: [joekehte, joekehts]
    joekehts+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: joekehtsommes

  Adjective - jolle: # c 
    jolle+A+Attr: jolle 
    jolle+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jollebe 
    jolle+A+Sg+Nom: jolle 
    jolle+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jollemes

  Adjective - jorpe: # 
    jorpe+A+Attr: jorpe 
    jorpe+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jorpebe 
    jorpe+A+Sg+Nom: jorpe 
    jorpe+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jorpemes

  Adjective - jovje: # 
    jovje+A+Attr: jovje 
    jovje+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jovjebe 
    jovje+A+Sg+Nom: jovje 
    jovje+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jovjemes

  Adjective - jueskies: # c 
    jueskies+A+Attr: jueskies 
    jueskies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jueskebe 
    jueskies+A+Sg+Nom: [jueskie, jueskies]
    jueskies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jueskemes

  Adjective - juhteles: # 
    juhteles+A+Attr: juhteles 
    juhteles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [juhtielabpa, juhtielåbpoe]
    juhteles+A+Sg+Nom: [juhteles, juhtele]
    juhteles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: juhtielommes

  Adjective - jupmeles: # 
    jupmeles+A+Attr: jupmeles 
    jupmeles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [jupmielabpa, jupmielåbpoe]
    jupmeles+A+Sg+Nom: [jupmeles, jupmele]
    jupmeles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jupmielommes

  Adjective - jåalhkoeh: # 
    jåalhkoeh+A+Attr: jåalhkoeh 
    jåalhkoeh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [jåalhkoehkabpa, jåalhkoehkåbpoe]
    jåalhkoeh+A+Sg+Nom: jåalhkoeh 
    jåalhkoeh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jåalhkoehkommes

  Adjective - jåalhkoes: # 
    jåalhkoes+A+Attr: jåalhkoes 
    jåalhkoes+A+Sg+Nom: jåalhkoes 

  Adjective - jåasoeh: # 
    jåasoeh+A+Attr: jåasoeh 
    jåasoeh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [jåasoehkabpa, jåasoehkåbpoe, jåasahkabpa, jåasahkåbpoe]
    jåasoeh+A+Sg+Nom: [jåasoeh, jåasan]
    jåasoeh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [jåasoehkommes, jåasahkommes, jåasmes]

  Adjective - jïermijes: # 
    jïermijes+A+Attr: [jïermijes, jïermije, jïermejes, jearmijes]
    jïermijes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [jïermijabpa, jïermijåbpoe, jïermejabpa, jïermejåbpoe]
    jïermijes+A+Sg+Nom: [jïermijes, jïermije, jïermejes, jïermeje]
    jïermijes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [jïermijommes, jïermejommes]

  Adjective - jïjnje: # c 
    jïjnje+A+Attr: jïjnje 
    jïjnje+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jïjnjebe 
    jïjnje+A+Sg+Nom: jïjnje 
    jïjnje+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jïjnjemes

  Adjective - jïlle: # 
    jïlle+A+Attr: jïlle 
    jïlle+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jïllebe 
    jïlle+A+Sg+Nom: jïlle 
    jïlle+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jïllemes

  Adjective - klaeries: # 
    klaeries+A+Attr: klaeries 
    klaeries+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: klaerebe 
    klaeries+A+Sg+Nom: [klaerie, klaeries]
    klaeries+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: klaeremes

  Adjective - kraejhpies: # 
    kraejhpies+A+Attr: kraejhpies 
    kraejhpies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: kraejhpebe 
    kraejhpies+A+Sg+Nom: [kraejhpie, kraejhpies]
    kraejhpies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: kraejhpemes

  Adjective - kraevies: # 
    kraevies+A+Attr: kraevies 
    kraevies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: kraevebe 
    kraevies+A+Sg+Nom: [kraevie, kraevies]
    kraevies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: kraevemes

  Adjective - kranhtjoeh: # 
    kranhtjoeh+A+Attr: kranhtjoeh 
    kranhtjoeh+A+Sg+Nom: kranhtjan 

  Adjective - kroenes: # 
    kroenes+A+Attr: kroenes 

  Adjective - kruana: # 
    kruana+A+Attr: kruana 
    kruana+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [kruenebe, kråanebe]
    kruana+A+Sg+Nom: kruana 
    kruana+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [kroenemes, kråanemes]

  Adjective - kruepies: # 
    kruepies+A+Attr: kruepies 
    kruepies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: kruepebe 
    kruepies+A+Sg+Nom: [kruepie, kruepies]
    kruepies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: kruepemes

  Adjective - krænkoeh: # 
    krænkoeh+A+Attr: krænkoeh 
    krænkoeh+A+Sg+Nom: krænkan 

  Adjective - kåvrehts: # 
    kåvrehts+A+Attr: kåvrehts 
    kåvrehts+A+Sg+Nom: [kåvrehte, kåvrehts]

  Adjective - laemies: # 
    laemies+A+Attr: laemies 
    laemies+A+Sg+Nom: [laemie, laemes]

  Adjective - latjkes: # 
    latjkes+A+Attr: latjkes 

  Adjective - liehties: # c 
    liehties+A+Attr: liehties 
    liehties+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: liehtebe 
    liehties+A+Sg+Nom: [liehtie, liehties]
    liehties+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: liehtemes

  Adjective - loeves: # c 
    loeves+A+Attr: loeves 
    loeves+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: loevebe 
    loeves+A+Sg+Nom: loeve 
    loeves+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: loevemes

  Adjective - lovve: # 
    lovve+A+Attr: lovve 
    lovve+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [lovvesabpa, lovvesåbpoe, lovvebe]
    lovve+A+Sg+Nom: [lovves, lovvese]
    lovve+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [lovvesommes, lovvemes]

  Adjective - lustes: # c 
    lustes+A+Attr: lustes 
    lustes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: lustebe 
    lustes+A+Sg+Nom: [luste, lustes]
    lustes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: lustemes

  Adjective - luvregs: # 
    luvregs+A+Attr: luvregs 

  Adjective - lyövlehke: # 
    lyövlehke+A+Attr: lyövlehke 
    lyövlehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [lyövlehkabpa, lyövlehkåbpoe]
    lyövlehke+A+Sg+Nom: lyövlehke 
    lyövlehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: lyövlehkommes

  Adjective - låabpoeh: # 
    låabpoeh+A+Attr: låabpoeh 

  Adjective - låagkoeh: # 
    låagkoeh+A+Attr: låagkoeh 
    låagkoeh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [låagkoehkabpa, låagkoehkåbpoe]
    låagkoeh+A+Sg+Nom: låagkoeh 
    låagkoeh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: låagkoehkommes

  Adjective - låedtjies: # c 
    låedtjies+A+Attr: [låedtjies, låedtjie]
    låedtjies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: låedtjebe 
    låedtjies+A+Sg+Nom: [låedtjie, låedtjies]
    låedtjies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: låedtjemes

  Adjective - låemties: # 
    låemties+A+Attr: låemties 
    låemties+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: låemtebe 
    låemties+A+Sg+Nom: [låemtie, låemties]
    låemties+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: låemtemes

  Adjective - låpsoes: # 
    låpsoes+A+Attr: låpsoes 
    låpsoes+A+Sg+Nom: låpsoes 

  Adjective - læhkoeladtje: # 
    læhkoeladtje+A+Attr: læhkoeladtje 
    læhkoeladtje+A+Sg+Nom: læhkoeladtje 

  Adjective - lïemkeds: # 
    lïemkeds+A+Attr: lïemkeds 
    lïemkeds+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [lïemkedabpa, lïemkedåbpoe]
    lïemkeds+A+Sg+Nom: [lïemkede, lïemkeds]
    lïemkeds+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: lïemkedommes

  Adjective - lïene: # 
    lïene+A+Attr: lïene 
    lïene+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [lïenebe, lïenesabpa, lïenesåbpoe]
    lïene+A+Sg+Nom: lïenes 
    lïene+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [lïenemes, lïenesommes]

  Adjective - lïhkes: # c 
    lïhkes+A+Attr: lïhkes 
    lïhkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: lïhkebe 
    lïhkes+A+Sg+Nom: lïhkes 
    lïhkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: lïhkemes

  Adjective - löövles: # 
    löövles+A+Attr: löövles 
    löövles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [löövlebe, lïevlebe, lïevlebe]
    löövles+A+Sg+Nom: löövles 
    löövles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [löövlemes, löövlemes, löövlemes]

  Adjective - madtan: # 
    madtan+A+Attr: madtan 
    madtan+A+Sg+Nom: madtan 

  Adjective - madtege: # 
    madtege+A+Attr: madtege 
    madtege+A+Sg+Nom: madtege 

  Adjective - madtjeles: # 
    madtjeles+A+Attr: [madtjeles, madtjele]
    madtjeles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [madtjalabpa, madtjalåbpoe]
    madtjeles+A+Sg+Nom: [madtjele, madtjeles]
    madtjeles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: madtjalommes

  Adjective - maedeles: # 
    maedeles+A+Attr: maedeles 
    maedeles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [maedielabpa, maedielåbpoe]
    maedeles+A+Sg+Nom: [maedeles, maedele]
    maedeles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: maedielommes

  Adjective - maehtehtje: # 
    maehtehtje+A+Attr: maehtehtje 
    maehtehtje+A+Sg+Nom: maehtehtje 

  Adjective - maehteles: # 
    maehteles+A+Attr: maehteles 
    maehteles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [maehtielabpa, maehtielåbpoe]
    maehteles+A+Sg+Nom: [maehteles, maehtele]
    maehteles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: maehtielommes

  Adjective - miehtjies: # 
    miehtjies+A+Attr: miehtjies 

  Adjective - murreds: # 
    murreds+A+Attr: murreds 
    murreds+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [murriedabpa, murriedåbpoe]
    murreds+A+Sg+Nom: [murrede, murreds]
    murreds+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: murriedommes

  Adjective - myövhke: # 
    myövhke+A+Attr: myövhke 
    myövhke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [myövhkebe, myövhkesabpa, myövhkesåbpoe]
    myövhke+A+Sg+Nom: myövhkes 
    myövhke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [myövhkemes, myövhkesommes]

  Adjective - måarehks: # c 
    måarehks+A+Attr: [måarehks, måarehke]
    måarehks+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [måarahkabpa, måarahkåbpoe]
    måarehks+A+Sg+Nom: [måarehks, måarehke]
    måarehks+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: måarahkommes

  Adjective - måasas: # 
    måasas+A+Attr: måasas 

  Adjective - måasere: # 
    måasere+A+Attr: måaseres 
    måasere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [måasarabpa, måasaråbpoe]
    måasere+A+Sg+Nom: måasere 
    måasere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: måasarommes

  Adjective - måaskes: # 
    måaskes+A+Attr: måaskes 
    måaskes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: måaskebe 
    måaskes+A+Sg+Nom: måaskes 
    måaskes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: måaskemes

  Adjective - måasoes: # 
    måasoes+A+Attr: måasoes 
    måasoes+A+Sg+Nom: måasoe 

  Adjective - mådtan: # 
    mådtan+A+Attr: mådtan 
    mådtan+A+Sg+Nom: mådtan 

  Adjective - måedtiesåårts: # 
    måedtiesåårts+A+Attr: måedtiesåårts 

  Adjective - måskoes: # 
    måskoes+A+Attr: måskoes 
    måskoes+A+Sg+Nom: måskoes 

  Adjective - mïevhke: # 
    mïevhke+A+Attr: [mïevhke, mïevhkes]
    mïevhke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [mïevhkebe, mïevhkesabpa, mïevhkesåbpoe]
    mïevhke+A+Sg+Nom: mïevhkes 
    mïevhke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [mïevhkemes, mïevhkesommes]

  Adjective - mïevres: # 
    mïevres+A+Attr: mïevres 
    mïevres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: mïevrebe 
    mïevres+A+Sg+Nom: mïevre 
    mïevres+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: mïevremes

  Adjective - mïrhkekruana: # 
    mïrhkekruana+A+Attr: mïrhkekruana 
    mïrhkekruana+A+Sg+Nom: mïrhkekruana 

  Adjective - möövhkes: # 
    möövhkes+A+Attr: möövhkes 
    möövhkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: möövhkebe 
    möövhkes+A+Sg+Nom: möövhkes 
    möövhkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: möövhkemes

  Adjective - naarpehke: # 
    naarpehke+A+Attr: naarpehke 
    naarpehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [naarpahkabpa, naarpahkåbpoe]
    naarpehke+A+Sg+Nom: naarpehke 
    naarpehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: naarpahkommes

  Adjective - nahkeren: # 
    nahkeren+A+Attr: nahkeren 
    nahkeren+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [nahkerabpa, nahkeråbpoe]
    nahkeren+A+Sg+Nom: nahkeren 
    nahkeren+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: nahkerommes

  Adjective - neahkoeh: # 
    neahkoeh+A+Attr: neahkoeh 
    neahkoeh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [neahkoehkabpa, neahkoehkåbpoe]
    neahkoeh+A+Sg+Nom: neahkoeh 
    neahkoeh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: neahkoehkommes

  Adjective - njaalmeldh: # 
    njaalmeldh+A+Attr: njaalmeldh 

  Adjective - njaarpehke: # 
    njaarpehke+A+Attr: njaarpehke 
    njaarpehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [njaarpahkabpa, njaarpahkåbpoe]
    njaarpehke+A+Sg+Nom: njaarpehke 
    njaarpehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: njaarpahkommes

  Adjective - njaelkies: # 
    njaelkies+A+Attr: njaelkies 
    njaelkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: njaelkebe 
    njaelkies+A+Sg+Nom: [njaelkie, njaelkies]
    njaelkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: njaelkemes

  Adjective - njalhkedihkie: # 
    njalhkedihkie+A+Sg+Nom: njalhkedihkie 

  Adjective - njalhkedihks: # 
    njalhkedihks+A+Attr: njalhkedihks 
    njalhkedihks+A+Sg+Nom: njalhkedihks 

  Adjective - njalkedihks: # 
    njalkedihks+A+Attr: njalkedihks 
    njalkedihks+A+Sg+Nom: njalkedihks 

  Adjective - njeerpes: # 
    njeerpes+A+Attr: [njeerpes, njeerpes]
    njeerpes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [njeerpebe, njeerpesabpa, njeerpesåbpoe]
    njeerpes+A+Sg+Nom: [njeerpes, njeerpes]
    njeerpes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [njeerpemes, njeerpesommes]

  Adjective - njoere: # 
    njoere+A+Attr: njoere 
    njoere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: njoerebe 
    njoere+A+Sg+Nom: njoeres 
    njoere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: njoeremes
